Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201271-1628.07
Satellite office of minority health;
duties.

(1) The Department of Health and Human Services shall
establish a satellite office of minority health in each congressional district
to coordinate and administer state policy relating to minority health. Each
office shall implement a minority health initiative in counties with a minority
population of at least five percent of the total population of the county
as determined by the most recent federal decennial census which shall target,
but not be limited to, infant mortality, cardiovascular disease, obesity,
diabetes, and asthma.

(2) Each office shall prepare an annual report regarding minority health
initiatives implemented in the immediately preceding fiscal year. The report
shall be submitted to the department by October 1. The department shall submit
such reports electronically to
the Health and Human Services Committee of the Legislature by December 1.

Laws 2001, LB 692, § 10;

Laws 2003, LB 412, § 1;

Laws 2005, LB 301, § 37;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 479;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 112.
July 19, 2012